Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0605

Term of director.

(1) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, and subject to subsections (3) and (4) of this section and RCW 23.100.0202(4), the term of a director expires at the annual members meeting following the director's election or appointment. The term of a director may not exceed three years.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may be reelected.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a director continues to serve until a successor director is elected or appointed and qualifies or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

(4) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director does not serve the remainder of the director's term if the director ceases to qualify to be a director.

[ 2019 c 37 s 605.]